en: Wax Paper
xx: Wax Paper
cs: Voskový papír
da: Vokspapir
de: Wachspapier
es: Papel de cera
fr: Papier sulfurisé
it: Carta cerata
ja: ワックスペーパー
nl: Bakpapier
no: Vokspapir
pl: Papier śniadaniowy
pt: Papel encerado
ru: Вощёная бумага
sv: Smörpapper
tr: Mumlu Kağıt

en: Honey Jars
xx: Honey Jars
cs: Nádoby na med
da: Honningkrukker
de: Honiggläser
es: Tarros de miel
fr: Pots à miel
it: Barattoli di miele
ja: はちみつ容器
nl: Honingkruiken
no: Honningkrukker
pl: Słoiki na miód
pt: Jarras para mel
ru: Банки для мёда
sv: Honungsburkar
tr: Bal Kavanozları

en: Food Storage Accessories
xx: Food Storage Accessories
cs: Uskladnění potravin – příslušenství
da: Madopbevaring – tilbehør
de: Essensaufbewahrung - Zubehör
es: Accesorios para el almacenamiento de comida
fr: Accessoires de stockage alimentaire
it: Accessori per la conservazione di alimenti
ja: 食品保存用品
nl: Accessoires voor het opslaan van voedsel
no: Tilbehør for matoppbevaring
pl: Akcesoria do przechowywania żywności
pt: Acessórios para armazenamento de alimentos
ru: Принадлежности для хранения пищевых продуктов
sv: Tillbehör till matförvaring
tr: Yiyecek Saklama Aksesuarları

en: Food & Beverage Labels
xx: Food & Beverage Labels
cs: Štítky na potraviny a nápoje
da: Etiketter til mad og drikke
de: Etiketten für Lebensmittel und Getränke
es: Etiquetas para alimentos y bebidas
fr: Étiquettes pour aliments et boissons
it: Etichette per cibo e bevande
ja: 食品ラベル、飲料ラベル
nl: Voedsel- en dranketiketten
no: Etiketter til mat og drikke
pl: Etykiety na żywność i napoje
pt: Rótulos de alimentos e bebidas
ru: Кухонные этикетки
sv: Etiketter för mat och dryck
tr: Yiyecek ve İçeçek Etiketleri

en: Food Wrap Dispensers
xx: Food Wrap Dispensers
cs: Držáky na kuchyňské fólie
da: Beholdere til køkkenfilm
de: Spender für Frischhaltefolie
es: Dispensadores de film plástico
fr: Distributeurs de film alimentaire
it: Dispenser per pellicola alimentare
ja: ラップ用ディスペンサー
nl: Foliedispensers
no: Dispensere for matfolie
pl: Podajniki do folii spożywczej
pt: Porta-rolo
ru: Диспенсеры пищевой пленки
sv: Plastfoliehållare
tr: Streç Film Dispanseri

en: Oxygen Absorbers
xx: Oxygen Absorbers
cs: Pohlcovače kyslíku
da: Iltabsorbering
de: Sauerstoffabsorber
es: Absorbentes de oxígeno
fr: Absorbeurs d'oxygène
it: Assorbitori di ossigeno
ja: 脱酸素剤
nl: Zuurstofabsorbeerders
no: Oksygenabsorberere
pl: Pochłaniacze tlenu
pt: Absorvedores de oxigênio
ru: Поглотители кислорода
sv: Syreabsorberare
tr: Oksijen Emiciler

en: Twist Ties & Bag Clips
xx: Twist Ties & Bag Clips
cs: Uzávěry na sáčky
da: Poselukkere
de: Verschlussstreifen & Verschlussclips
es: Pinzas para bolsas y ataduras de alambre
fr: Attaches et pinces à sac
it: Nastri metallici e mollette fermasacchetti
ja: ビニタイ・袋止めクリップ
nl: Sluitstrips
no: Lukkeklips og poseklips
pl: Druciki w osłonce i klipsy do torebek
pt: Laços e prendedores de sacos
ru: Клипсы и зажимы для пакетов
sv: Twist ties och påsklämmor
tr: Torba Bağları ve Klipsleri

en: Kitchen Appliance Accessories
xx: Kitchen Appliance Accessories
cs: Kuchyňské spotřebiče – příslušenství
da: Køkkenapparater – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Küchengeräte
es: Accesorios para aparatos de cocina
fr: Accessoires petit électroménager
it: Accessori strumenti cucina
ja: キッチン家電関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor keukenmachines
no: Tilbehør til kjøkkenapparater
pl: Akcesoria do sprzętów kuchennych
pt: Acessórios para eletrodomésticos de cozinha
ru: Принадлежности для кухонного оборудования
sv: Tillbehör till köksapparater
tr: Mutfak Aleti Aksesuarları

en: Breadmaker Accessories
xx: Breadmaker Accessories
cs: Domácí pekárny – příslušenství
da: Brødbager – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Brotbackautomaten
es: Accesorios de horno de pan
fr: Accessoires pour machines à pain
it: Accessori macchina per il pane
ja: ホームベーカリー関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor broodmachines
no: Tilbehør til brødbakemaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do wypieku chleba
pt: Acessórios para panificador
ru: Принадлежности для хлебопечек
sv: Tillbehör till bakmaskiner
tr: Ekmek Yapma Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Coffee Maker & Espresso Machine Accessories
xx: Coffee Maker & Espresso Machine Accessories
cs: Kávovary a automaty na espreso – příslušenství
da: Kassemaskiner og espressomaskiner
de: Zubehör für Kaffee- & Espressomaschinen
es: Accesorios para cafeteras
fr: Accessoires pour cafetières et machines à expresso
it: Accessori macchine da caffè e da espresso
ja: コーヒーメーカー・エスプレッソマシン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor koffiezetapparaten en espressomachines
no: Tilbehør til kaffetraktere og espressomaskiner
pl: Akcesoria do ekspresów do kawy i espresso
pt: Acessórios para máquina de café e para máquina de café expresso
ru: Принадлежности для кофеварок и эспрессо-машин
sv: Tillbehör till kaffebryggare och espressomaskiner
tr: Kahve Makinesi ve Espresso Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Pod coffee machine
fr: Cafetière à dosettes

en: Coffee Decanter Warmers
xx: Coffee Decanter Warmers
cs: Ohřívadla na karafy na kávu
da: Varmeplader til kaffekander
de: Kaffeekannenwarmhalter
es: Calentadores para jarras de café
fr: Réchauds à café
it: Riscaldatori per caraffe di caffè
ja: コーヒーデカンターウォーマー
nl: Warmhoudplaatjes voor koffie
no: Kaffevarmeplater
pl: Podgrzewacze do dzbanków do kawy
pt: Aquecedores para decantador de café
ru: Подогреватели для кофейников
sv: Värmeplattor för kaffekannor
tr: Kahve Sürahisi Isıtıcılar

en: Coffee Decanters
xx: Coffee Decanters
cs: Konvice na kávu
da: Kaffekander
de: Kaffeekannen
es: Jarras de café
fr: Carafes de café
it: Caraffe caffè
ja: コーヒーデカンタ
nl: Koffiepotten
no: Kaffekanner
pl: Dzbanki do kawy
pt: Garrafas de café
ru: Кофейники
sv: Kaffekannor
tr: Kahve Sürahileri

en: Coffee Filter Baskets
xx: Coffee Filter Baskets
cs: Kávové filtry – misky
da: Kaffefilterholdere
de: Kaffeefilterkörbe
es: Cesta para filtros del café
fr: Paniers à filtre cafetière
it: Cestini filtri caffè
ja: コーヒードリッパー
nl: Koffiefilterhouders
no: Kaffefilterkurver
pl: Uchwyty na filtry do kawy
pt: Cestas para filtros de café
ru: Корзинки-фильтры для кофе
sv: Korgar för kaffefilter
tr: Kahve Filtre Sepetleri

en: Coffee Filters
xx: Coffee Filters
cs: Kávové filtry
da: Kaffefiltre
de: Kaffeefilter
es: Filtros de café
fr: Filtres à café
it: Filtri caffè
ja: コーヒーフィルター
nl: Koffiefilters
no: Kaffefiltre
pl: Filtry do kawy
pt: Filtros de café
ru: Фильтры для кофе
sv: Kaffefilter
tr: Kahve Filtreleri

en: Coffee Grinder Accessories
xx: Coffee Grinder Accessories
cs: Mlýnky na kávu – příslušenství
da: Kaffekværn – tilbehør
de: Kaffeemühlenzubehör
es: Accesorios para molinillo de café
fr: Accessoires pour moulins à café
it: Accessori macinacaffè
ja: コーヒーミル関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor koffiemolens
no: Tilbehør til kaffekverner
pl: Akcesoria do młynków do kawy
pt: Acessórios para moedor de café
ru: Принадлежности для кофемолок
sv: Tillbehör till kaffekvarnar
tr: Kahve Değirmeni Aksesuarları

en: Coffee Grinders
xx: Coffee Grinders
cs: Mlýnky na kávu
da: Kaffekværne
de: Kaffeemühlen
es: Molinillos de café
fr: Moulins à café
it: Macinacaffè
ja: コーヒーミル
nl: Koffiemolens
no: Kaffekverner
pl: Młynki do kawy
pt: Moedores de café
ru: Кофемолки
sv: Kaffekvarnar
tr: Kahve Değirmenleri

en: Coffee Maker & Espresso Machine Replacement Parts
xx: Coffee Maker & Espresso Machine Replacement Parts
cs: Náhradní díly pro kávovary a espresa
da: Reservedele til kaffe- og espressomaskiner
de: Ersatzteile für Espresso- & Kaffeemaschinen
es: Piezas de repuesto para cafeteras y máquinas de café espresso
fr: Pièces de rechange pour cafetières et machines à expresso
it: Parti di ricambio per macchine da caffè espresso e caffettiere
ja: コーヒーメーカー・エスプレッソマシン用交換部品
nl: Vervangingsonderdelen voor koffiezetapparaten en espressomachines
no: Reservedeler til kaffetraktere og espressomaskiner
pl: Części zamienne do kawiarek i ekspresów
pt: Peças de reposição para máquinas de café e de expresso
ru: Детали для кофеварок и автоматов эспрессо
sv: Reservdelar till kaffe- och espressomaskiner
tr: Kahve Makinesi ve Espresso Makinesi Yedek Parçaları

en: Coffee Maker Water Filters
xx: Coffee Maker Water Filters
cs: Vodní filtry do kávovarů
da: Vandfiltre til kaffemaskiner
de: Wasserfilter für Kaffeemaschinen
es: Filtros de agua para cafeteras
fr: Filtres à eau pour machines à café
it: Filtri acqua macchine caffè
ja: コーヒーメーカー用浄水フィルター
nl: Waterfilters voor koffiezetapparaten
no: Vannfiltre til kaffetraktere
pl: Filtry wody do ekspresów do kawy
pt: Filtros de água para cafeteiras
ru: Фильтры для воды для кофеварок
sv: Vattenfilter för kaffebryggare
tr: Kahve Makinesi Su Filtreleri

en: Frothing Pitchers
xx: Frothing Pitchers
cs: Džbánek na mléčnou pěnu
da: Mælkeskumkander
de: Aufschäumer
es: Jarras para espumar
fr: Pichets pour mousse de lait
it: Bollilatte
ja: ミルクピッチャー
nl: Opschuimkannen
no: Dampmugger
pl: Dzbanki do spieniania
pt: Jarras para café expresso
ru: Кувшины для латте
sv: Kannor för skummad mjölk
tr: Süt Köpürtme Cezveleri